North Dakota, session 69, HB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 39-06.1-10 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. If a report of a conviction of a traffic offense, or admission or adjudication of a traffic
violation is received by the director, the director shall proceed to enter the proper
points on the licensee's driving record, unless the points assigned to the violation are
two or less. If the points assigned to the violation are two or less, the violation and
points may not be entered on the driving record but must be recorded separately, and
the separate record is not available to the public. Points from a violation in which the
points are two or less are considered a part of the driving record for the sole purpose
of point reduction under section 39 - 06.1 - 13 and for purposes of license suspension . If
the driving record shows that the licensee has accumulated a total of twelve or more
points, assigned on the basis of the schedule contained in subsection 3, the director
shall notify the licensee of the director's intention to suspend the operator's license
under section 39-06-33. For the purposes of this chapter, the director also may receive
and act on reports of traffic offense convictions forwarded by federal, military, and
tribal courts in this state.
Page No. 1 25.0750.01000